Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 1. General and Administrative Provisions.

§ 45.2-1000.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Approximate original contour”
means the surface configuration achieved by backfilling and grading the mined area so that the reclaimed area, including any terracing or access road, closely resembles the general surface configuration of the land prior to mining and blends into and complements the drainage pattern of the surrounding terrain, with all highwalls and spoil piles eliminated; water impoundments may be permitted where the Director determines that they are in compliance with the applicable performance standards adopted pursuant to this chapter.

“Coal surface mining and reclamation operation”
means a surface mining operation and any activity necessary and incidental to the reclamation of such operation.

“Coal surface mining operation”
means:

Any activity conducted on the surface of lands in connection with a surface coal mine or, subject to the requirements of §

45.2-1018

, any surface operation and surface impact incident to an underground coal mine, the products of which enter commerce or the operation of which directly or indirectly affects interstate commerce. Such activity includes (i) excavation for the purpose of obtaining coal, including by such common methods as contour, strip, auger, mountaintop removal, box cut, open pit, and area mining; (ii) the use of explosives and blasting; (iii) in situ distillation or retorting, leaching, or other chemical or physical processing; and (iv) the cleaning, concentrating, or other processing or preparation and loading of coal for interstate commerce at or near the mine site. However, such activity does not include the extraction of coal incidental to the extraction of other minerals where coal does not exceed 16 and two-thirds percent of the tonnage of minerals removed for purposes of commercial use or sale, or coal exploration subject to §

45.2-1008

; and

The area upon which such activity occurs or where such activity disturbs the natural land surface. Such area includes (i) any adjacent land whose use is incidental to any such activity; (ii) all lands affected by the construction of any new road or the improvement or use of any existing road to gain access to the site of such activity and for haulage; and (iii) any excavation, workings, impoundment, dam, ventilation shaft, entryway, refuse bank, dump, stockpile, overburden pile, spoil bank, culm bank, tailings, hole or depression, repair area, storage area, processing area, shipping area, and other area upon which is sited any structure, facility, or other property or materials on the surface, resulting from or incident to such activity.“Division” means the Division of Mined Land Repurposing.“Federal act” means the federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, P.L. 95-87, 91 U.S. Stat. 445.“Imminent danger to the health and safety of the public” means the existence in a coal surface mining and reclamation operation of any condition, practice, or violation of a permit or other requirement of this chapter that could reasonably be expected to cause substantial physical harm to a person outside the permit area before such condition, practice, or violation can be abated. A reasonable expectation of substantial physical harm, including death or serious injury, before abatement exists if a rational person, subjected to the same condition or practice giving rise to the peril, would not expose himself to the danger during the time necessary for abatement.“Operator” means any person engaging in a coal surface mining operation whether or not such coal is sold within the Commonwealth.“Other minerals” means clay, stone, sand, gravel, metalliferous or nonmetalliferous ore, and any other solid material or substance of commercial value excavated in solid form from natural deposits on or in the earth, exclusive of coal and any mineral that occurs naturally in liquid or gaseous form.“Permit” means a permit issued by the Director pursuant to state regulations.“Permit area” means the area of land indicated on the approved map submitted by the operator with the operator’s application. Such area of land shall be covered by the operator’s bond as required by §

45.2-1016

and shall be readily identifiable by appropriate markers on the site.“Permittee” means a person holding any of the following permits issued by the Director: (i) a permit for coal surface mining pursuant to §

45.2-1009

, (ii) a permit for coal exploration pursuant to §

45.2-1008

, or (iii) a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit pursuant to §

45.2-1029

.“Person” means any individual, partnership, association, joint venture, trust, company, firm, joint stock company, corporation, other group or combination acting as a unit, or other legal entity.“Secretary” means the U.S. Secretary of the Interior.“State or local agency” means any department, agency, or instrumentality of the Commonwealth; public authority, municipal corporation, local governmental unit, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth; or department, agency, or instrumentality of any public authority, municipal corporation, local governmental unit, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth; or two or more of any of the aforementioned.“State regulations” means the permanent state regulatory program established by this chapter meeting the requirements of the federal act for the regulation of coal surface mining and reclamation operations within the Commonwealth, submitted to the Secretary pursuant to § 503 of the federal act.“Unwarranted failure to comply” means the failure of a permittee to (i) prevent the occurrence of any violation of its permit or any requirement of this chapter due to indifference, lack of diligence, or lack of reasonable care or (ii) abate any violation of such permit or requirement of this chapter due to indifference, lack of diligence, or lack of reasonable care.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-229; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 387, 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, amended § 45.1-229 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the amendment by c. 532 has been given effect in this section by substituting “Division of Mined Land Repurposing” for “Division of Mined Land Reclamation” in definition for “Division.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1001.
Limitations of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter is intended or shall be construed to limit, impair, abridge, create, enlarge, or otherwise affect, substantially or procedurally, the rights of any person in any dispute involving property rights, including interests in water resources, or the right of any person to seek damages or other relief on account of injury to persons or property, including interests in water resources, and to maintain any action or other appropriate proceeding therefor, except as is otherwise specifically provided in this chapter. Nothing in this chapter is intended or shall be construed to affect the powers of the Commonwealth to initiate, prosecute, or maintain actions to abate public nuisances.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-228; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1002.
Application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the extraction of coal:

By a landowner for his own noncommercial use from land owned or leased by him; or

As an incidental part of federal, state, or local government-financed highway or other construction under regulations established by the Director.

Any agency, unit, or instrumentality of the Commonwealth, or of federal or local government, including any publicly owned utility or publicly owned corporation of federal, state, or local government, that proposes to engage in coal surface mining operations that are subject to the requirements of this chapter shall comply with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1979, c. 290, §§ 45.1-259, 45.1-253; 1984, c. 590; 1988, c. 295; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1003.
Authority and duties of Director.

The authority to adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter is vested in the Director. Such regulations shall be consistent with regulations adopted by the Secretary pursuant to the federal act or in conformity with any court ruling construing such act. The Director may adopt by regulation definitions other than those provided in §

45.2-1000

as necessary to carry out the intent of this chapter. Unless otherwise directed by law, in adopting regulations, the Director shall comply with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) and the Virginia Register Act (§

2.2-4100

et seq.).

In addition to the adoption of regulations under this chapter, the Director may issue or distribute to the public interpretative, advisory, or procedural bulletins pertaining to permit applications or to matters reasonably related thereto without following any of the procedures set forth in the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). Such materials shall be clearly designated as to their nature, shall be provided solely for purposes of public information and education, and shall not have the force of regulations.

The authority to administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter is vested in the Director. In administering and enforcing the provisions of this chapter, the Director shall exercise the following powers in addition to any other powers conferred upon him by law:

To supervise the administration and enforcement of this chapter; to make investigations and inspections necessary to ensure compliance with this chapter; to conduct hearings, administer oaths, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of witnesses and production of written or printed material as provided for in this chapter; to issue orders and notices of violation; to review and vacate or modify or approve orders and decisions; and to order the suspension, revocation, or withholding of any permit for failure to comply with any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted hereunder;

To administer the program for the purchase and reclamation of abandoned and unreclaimed mine areas pursuant to Article 4 (§

45.2-1031

et seq.);

To encourage and conduct investigations, research, experiments, and demonstrations and to collect and disseminate information relating to coal surface mining and reclamation of lands and waters affected by coal surface mining;

To receive any federal, state, or other funds and to enter into any contracts for which funds are available to carry out the purposes of this chapter; and

To enter into cooperative agreements with the Secretary to regulate coal surface mining on federal lands.

The Division of Mined Land Repurposing shall have the responsibilities provided under this chapter and such duties and responsibilities as the Director may assign or as may be provided for in regulations adopted by the Director.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-230; 1982, c. 425; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 387, 532.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, effective October 1, 2021, amended § 45.1-230 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the amendment by c. 532 has been given effect in this section by substituting “Division of Mined Land Repurposing” for “Division of Mined Land Reclamation” in subsection C.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 532, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-1004.
Training and certification of blasters.

In order to ensure that explosives are used only in accordance with applicable state and federal laws, the Director may adopt regulations requiring the training, examination, and certification of persons engaging in or directly responsible for blasting or the use, storage, and handling of explosives in coal surface mining operations.

The Division shall assume primary responsibility for conducting the examinations and issuing the certificates for such persons in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-256; 1984, cc. 230, 590; 1996, c. 758; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1005.
Conflicts of interest prohibited.

For the purposes of this section, “financial interest” includes a pecuniary interest accruing to an employee or to the employee’s spouse, minor child, or other relative living in the same household.

No employee of the Department performing any function or duty under this chapter shall have a financial interest in any underground or surface coal mining operation.

The Director shall adopt regulations for the monitoring and enforcement of the provisions of this section, including regulations (i) for the filing and review of statements and supplements by employees concerning any financial interest that might be affected by this section; (ii) for the hiring, transfer, and removal of employees consistent with the prohibition of this section; (iii) for the resolution of prohibited interests; (iv) for the confidentiality, protection, and disclosure to enforcement authorities of reporting statements; and (v) for such exemptions from the provisions of this section as are consistent with federal law.

Judicial proceedings to enforce the provisions of this section may be brought by the Attorney General at the request of the Director.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as repealing or amending any other provision of law pertaining to conflicts of interest except that in cases of conflict, the provisions of this section shall control.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-231; 1984, c. 590; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1006.
Resisting, etc., Director or agent of the Director; penalty.

It is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than $5,000, confinement in jail for not more than one year, or both, for any person, except as permitted by law, to willfully resist, prevent, impede, or interfere with the Director or any agent of the Director in the performance of duties pursuant to this chapter.

History.

1979, c. 290, § 45.1-257; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-1007.
Coal Surface Mining Regulatory Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Coal Surface Mining Regulatory Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All fees collected pursuant to §

45.2-1010

or another provision of this chapter shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for administering coal surface mining state regulations. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Director.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.